Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1165.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "unmanned aircraft systems safety act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the state transportation department. (b) "Peace officer" means an individual who is licensed or certified as a law enforcement officer under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615, and who is employed by this state or a political subdivision of this state. (c) "Unmanned aircraft" and "unmanned aircraft system" mean those terms as defined in section 3 of the unmanned aircraft systems act, 2016 PA 436, MCL 259.303. Sec. 3. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, 14 CFR parts 89, 91, and 107, as in effect on the effective date of this act, are adopted by reference and apply to the operation of unmanned aircraft systems in this state, to the extent not preempted by federal law. (2) The regulations adopted under subsection (1) have the force and effect of state law for the purposes of enforcement by state and local law enforcement agencies. (3) A reference in the regulations adopted under subsection (1) to the administrator or the Federal Aviation Administration does not limit the enforcement authority granted under this act. Sec. 5. (1) A peace officer may enforce compliance with the federal regulations adopted under section 3 when an unmanned aircraft is operated in this state. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply if the violation constitutes a felony or misdemeanor under federal law. Sec. 7. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, an individual who violates a regulation adopted under section 3 is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $500.00. (2) An individual who violates a regulation adopted under section 3 for a second or subsequent time within 12 months after the first violation is responsible for a state civil infraction and may be ordered to pay a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00. (3) An individual who violates a regulation adopted under section 3 in a manner that involves reckless operation, interference with a manned aircraft, operation in restricted or prohibited airspace, or failure to comply with lawful direction of a peace officer is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (4) This section does not apply to conduct that constitutes a felony or misdemeanor under federal law. Sec. 9. (1) An unmanned aircraft required under federal law to be equipped with remote identification must be operated in compliance with 14 CFR part 89. (2) A peace officer may rely on remote identification broadcast information or airspace awareness technology to establish reasonable suspicion or probable cause of a violation. Sec. 11. (1) This act applies to recreational unmanned aircraft operations only to the extent permitted under 49 USC 44809. (2) This act does not authorize enforcement actions inconsistent with federal recreational exceptions. Sec. 13. The department may promulgate rules necessary to administer, interpret, and enforce this act, including the adoption of updated federal unmanned aircraft regulations by reference, under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.